Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB452.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a landlord who owns
residential rental property and has been cited by a local code enforcement board
for a violation of a housing, building, plumbing, electrical, fire, or nuisance
ordinance of the local government in which the property is located shall be civilly
liable to the tenant or tenants occupying the property for damages as provided in
subsection (3) of this section if the landlord does not cure the violation within
ninety (90) days of the citation.
(2) (a) 1. If a landlord has not cured the violation under subsection (1) of this
section within ninety (90) days, and a tenant has filed a civil action
under this section, the landlord shall obtain a cost estimate for repairs
necessary to cure the violation from a licensed and bonded contractor.
2. A tenant may, at his or her own expense, obtain a cost estimate for
repairs necessary to cure the violation from a licensed and bonded
contractor after the filing of a civil action under this section.
3. If a cost estimate obtained by the tenant is less than the cost estimate
obtained by the landlord, the trial court shall determine as a matter of
law whether the cost to cure the violation equals or exceeds twelve (12)
months' rent.
(b) If the cost to cure the violation determined under paragraph (a) of this
subsection is an amount equal to or greater than the cost of twelve (12)
months' rent, the landlord may:
1. Refund all rent paid by the tenant under the rental agreement
maintained between the parties since the beginning of the tenancy;
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1053
and
2. Demand exclusive possession of the property from the tenant within
thirty (30) days.
(3) A tenant who files a civil action under this section and prevails in the claim may
be entitled to recover the following damages:
(a) Three (3) months' periodic rent;
(b) Reasonable attorney's fees;
(c) Punitive damages under KRS 411.186; and
(d) If the citation by the local code enforcement board related to faulty
provision or maintenance of water or ventilation systems that resulted in the
presence of toxic mold, reimbursement for:
1. Any expenses incurred by the tenant in obtaining experts to document
the presence of toxic mold on the property; and
2. Medical bills for treatment of a respiratory illness sustained by a
tenant or an immediate family member of the tenant lawfully residing
at the property arising as a direct and proximate result of the violation
cited by the local code enforcement board. Diagnosis by a licensed
physician or nurse practitioner of a respiratory illness shall be prima
facie evidence of proximate relationship to a violation, and shall
create a rebuttable presumption that medical bills concerning
respiratory illness of a tenant or an immediate family member of the
tenant are proximately related to a violation.
(4) (a) Any forcible detainer action brought by a landlord during the pendency of a
civil action under this section:
1. Shall be filed upon motion with the trial court hearing the civil action
and not as a separate action; and
2. May be dismissed by the trial court for good cause upon the motion of
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1053
the tenant, even if erroneously filed as a separate action.
(b) If the trial court determines that the forcible detainer action was made in
retaliation after the tenant initiated a:
1. Complaint with the local code enforcement board that resulted in the
citation for a violation as described in subsection (1) of this section;
2. Complaint with the landlord that resulted in the citation for a violation
as described in subsection (1) of this section; or
3. Civil action under this section;
the trial court may award damages of up to three (3) months' rent to the
tenant in addition to any damages awarded under subsection (3) of this
section.
(5) All rent due during the pendency of a civil action under this section shall be paid
into court until the conclusion of the action. The court shall determine the
amount due to each party and distribute the funds equitably according to the
findings and judgment in the action.
(6) This section shall be construed to impose a duty upon any landlord owning
residential rental property to repair the property at least to the applicable
standards promulgated by the local government for which the code enforcement
board has jurisdiction.
(7) Any provision included in a lease agreement for a residential rental property
shall be void and unenforceable if it:
(a) Waives a tenant's rights under this section; or
(b) Compels arbitration of a claim under this section.
(8) This section shall supersede common law to the extent it is in conflict.
(9) This section shall operate independently of the Uniform Residential Landlord
and Tenant Act, KRS 383.505 to 383.715, and shall apply in every local
jurisdiction in the Commonwealth.
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:08 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1053
(10) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of this section that can be given effect without the invalid provision
or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the Make Our Landlords Diligent
(M.O.L.D.) Act.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 1/3/2025 1:08 PM Jacketed